ko: 일체형 충전 옵션: AC 콘센트; 없음; USB 타입 A; USB 타입 C; 무선 충전기; 기타
nl: Geïntegreerde oplaadopties: Stopcontact (AC); Geen; USB-A; USB-C; Draadloze oplader; Overige
fr: Options de recharge intégrées: Prise secteur; Aucune; USB type A; USB type C; Chargeur sans fil; Autre
en: Integrated charging options: AC outlet; None; USB type-A; USB type-C; Wireless charger; Other
nb: Integrerte ladealternativer: Stikkontakt (AC-uttak); Ingen; USB type-A; USB type-C; Trådløs lader; Annet
th: ตัวเลือกการชาร์จในตัว: เต้าเสียบ AC; ไม่มี; USB Type-A; USB Type-C; ที่ชาร์จไร้สาย; อื่นๆ
tr: Entegre şarj seçenekleri: AC prizi; Yok; USB Tip A; USB Tip C; Kablosuz şarj cihazı; Diğer
sv: Integrerade laddningsmöjligheter: Nätuttag (AC); Ingen; USB typ-A; USB typ-C; Trådlös laddare; Övrigt
el: Ενσωματωμένες επιλογές φόρτισης: Πρίζα AC; Κανένα; USB Type-A; USB Type-C; Ασύρματος φορτιστής; Άλλο
ja: 統合充電オプション: ACコンセント; なし; USB Type-A; USB Type-C; ワイヤレス充電器; その他
ru: Варианты встроенной зарядки: Розетка переменного тока; Нет; USB Type-A; USB Type-C; Беспроводная зарядка; Другое
de: Integrierte Ladeoptionen: Steckdose (Wechselstrom); Keine; USB Typ-A; USB Typ-C; Kabelloses Ladegerät; Sonstige
hr-HR: Integrirane opcije punjenja: AC utičnica; Ništa; USB Type-A; USB Type-C; Bežični punjač; Ostalo
it: Opzioni integrate di alimentazione/ricarica: Presa CA; Nessuna; USB Type-A; USB Type-C; Caricatore wireless; Altro
sk-SK: Možnosti integrovaného nabíjania: Zásuvka striedavého prúdu (AC); Žiadne; USB Type-A; USB Type-C; Bezdrôtová nabíjačka; Iné
fi: Integroidut latausvaihtoehdot: Vaihtovirtapistorasia; Ei mitään; USB tyyppi A; USB tyyppi C; Langaton laturi; Muu
zh-TW: 內建充電選項: 交流電 (AC) 插座; 無; USB Type-A; USB Type-C; 無線充電器; 其他
cs: Integrované možnosti nabíjení: AC zásuvka; Žádné; USB typ A; USB typ C; Bezdrátová nabíječka; Jiné
zh-CN: 集成充电选项: 交流插座; 无; USB Type-A; USB Type-C; 无线充电器; 其他
pt-BR: Opções integradas e carregamento: Tomada CA; Nenhuma; USB tipo A; USB tipo C; Carregador sem fio; Outras
es: Opciones integradas de carga: Toma de CA; Ninguno; USB tipo A; USB tipo C; Cargador inalámbrico; Otro
pl: Zintegrowane opcje ładowania: Gniazdo sieciowe (AC); Brak; Port USB typu A; Port USB typu C; Ładowarka bezprzewodowa; Inne
sl-SI: Možnosti integriranega polnjenja: Vtičnica AC; Brez; USB vrste A; USB vrste C; Brezžični polnilnik; Drugo
pt-PT: Opções de carregamento integradas: Tomada CA; Nenhum; USB tipo A; USB tipo C; Carregador sem fios; Outro
ro-RO: Opțiuni de încărcare integrate: Priză de curent alternativ (CA); Fără; USB tip A; USB tip C; Încărcător wireless; Altele
hu: Beépített töltési lehetőségek: AC-aljzat; Nincs; A típusú USB; C típusú USB; Vezeték nélküli töltő; Egyéb
da: Integrerede opladningsmuligheder: Stikkontakt; Ingen; USB type-A; USB type-C; Trådløs oplader; Andet
bg-BG: Опции за интегрирано зареждане: AC контакт; Няма; USB Type-A; USB Type-C; Безжично зарядно устройство; Други
lt-LT: Integruotos įkrovimo parinktys: Kintamosios srovės lizdas; Nėra; USB-A tipo jungtis; USB-C tipo jungtis; Belaidis įkroviklis; Kita
vi: Các tùy chọn sạc tích hợp: Ổ cắm điện AC; Không; USB Type-A; USB Type-C; Sạc không dây; Khác